Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “foster child student”  means a student enrolled
in middle school or high school who is a foster child because the student is:
(a) In the care and custody of the Department of Human Services  pursuant to the pro-
visions of ORS chapter 418 or 419B and is placed in substitute care; or
(b) A ward, as defined in ORS  419A.004, who remains in the legal custody of the ward’s
parent or who is in the care and custody of the Department of Human  Services but who is
residing with the ward’s parent.
(2)(a) The Department of Education  shall establish and administer a pilot program to
provide support for foster child students to improve the educational outcomes of foster child
students.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-A) Page 1
(b) Under the pilot program, the department shall provide  grants to public schools in this
state to improve the educational outcomes of foster child students by addressing:
(A) The disparities experienced by foster child students in indicators of academic success;
(B) The historical practices leading to  disproportionate outcomes for foster child stu-
dents; and
(C) The educational needs of foster child students.
(c) Schools participating in the pilot program must ensure that foster child  students are
provided access to an individual who will:
(A) Serve as an educational advocate for a foster child student; and
(B) Provide guidance for and support to a foster child student for educational purposes.
(3) The department shall use moneys  in the Statewide Education Initiatives Account to
provide funding for the pilot program. The pilot program shall be considered a statewide ed-
ucation plan for purposes of ORS 327.254.
(4) The  department shall select three public middle or high schools in this state to par-
ticipate in the pilot  program. The department shall focus on geographically diverse regions
when selecting schools to participate in the pilot program.
(5) The Department of Education shall  submit reports concerning the pilot program to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education as follows:
(a) The first report must be submitted no later than September 15, 2025, and  must sum-
marize progress on the development and administration of the pilot program.
(b) The second report must be submitted no later than September 15, 2027, and:
(A) Must provide a summary of the pilot program, including any  changes in the educa-
tional outcomes of foster child students who participated in the pilot program; and
(B) May provide recommendations for a statewide education plan related to  foster child
students.
(6) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 2.
The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules, and  the Department of
Education shall take any actions, necessary to  ensure that grants described in section 1 of
this 2024 Act are distributed no later than July 1, 2024.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 14, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of Educa-
tion from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under ORS  327.250 for
operations, is increased by $130,942 for the implementation of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 13 (3), chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS 327.250 for all other grants, is increased by $450,000 for the
implementation of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-A) Page 3